Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2414
Department; powers; grounds for disciplinary action.

The department shall have (1) the authority to inspect any emergency box and (2) access to the records of the supplying pharmacy and the long-term care facility for inspection. Refusal to allow the department to inspect an emergency box or to have access to records shall be grounds for a disciplinary action against the supplying pharmacy or the license of the long-term care facility.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 186;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 72.